Montana, session 2025, SB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 70-24-114, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-24-114. Emotional support animals -- documentation. (1) A tenant with a disability or a
disability-related need for an emotional support animal may request and be approved by a landlord to keep an
emotional support animal as a reasonable accommodation in housing.
(2) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, rule, or regulation, a landlord may:
(a) deny a reasonable accommodation request for an emotional support animal if the animal poses
a direct threat to the safety or health of others or poses a direct threat of physical damage to the property that
cannot be reduced or eliminated by another reasonable accommodation;
(b) if a tenant's disability-related need for an emotional support animal is not readily apparent,
request supporting information that reasonably supports the tenant's need for the particular emotional support
animal being requested. Supporting information may must include:
(i) information from a health care practitioner who has personal knowledge of the tenant's
disability and is acting within the scope of the practitioner's practice that identifies the particular assistance or
therapeutic emotional support provided by the specific animal. Information submitted under this subsection
(2)(b)(i) must include the effective date, license number, and type of professional license held by the health
care practitioner; and or
(ii) information from any other source that the landlord determines to be reliable in accordance with
the federal Fair Housing Act and Title 49, chapter 2; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 149
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 149
(c) require proof of compliance with state and local licensure and vaccination requirements for
each emotional support animal.
(3) If a tenant requests to keep more than one emotional support animal, information for each
emotional support animal must be provided pursuant to subsection (2).
(4) A landlord:
(a) may not request information under this section that discloses a diagnosis or severity of a
tenant's disability or any medical records relating to the disability, but a tenant may voluntarily disclose such
information or medical records to the landlord at the tenant's discretion; and
(b) shall issue a written determination after receiving supplemental information required in
subsection (2) and notice the determination pursuant to 70-24-108.
(5) An emotional support animal registration of any kind, including but not limited to an
identification card, patch, certificate, or similar registration obtained electronically or in person, is not, by itself,
sufficient information to reliably establish that a tenant has a disability-related need for an emotional support
animal.
(6) A tenant with a disability-related need for an emotional support animal is liable for any damage
done to the premises or to another person on the premises by the tenant's emotional support animal.
(7) A health care practitioner may be subject to disciplinary action from the health care
practitioner's licensing board for a violation of this section.
(8) This section does not apply to a service animal as defined in 49-4-203.
(9) Nothing in this section may be construed to restrict existing federal law and state law related to
a person's right to a reasonable accommodation and equal access to housing, including but not limited to the
federal Fair Housing Act, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, or Title 49, chapter 2.
(10) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Emotional support animal" means an animal that a health care practitioner has determined
provides emotional, cognitive, or other similar support to an individual with a disability and does not need to be
trained or certified. The term does not include service animals as defined in 49-4-203.
(b) "Health care practitioner" means a mental health professional as defined in 53-21-102 who is
licensed to practice in this state and who:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 149
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 149
(i) has established a client-provider relationship with a tenant at least 30 days prior to providing
supporting information requested from a landlord regarding the tenant's need for an emotional support animal;
(ii) completes a clinical evaluation of a tenant regarding the need for an emotional support animal;
and
(iii) is acting within the scope of practice of the person's license or certificate."
Section 2. Section 70-33-110, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-33-110. Emotional support animals -- documentation. (1) A tenant with a disability or a
disability-related need for an emotional support animal may request and be approved by a landlord to keep an
emotional support animal as a reasonable accommodation in housing.
(2) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, rule, or regulation, a landlord may:
(a) deny a reasonable accommodation request for an emotional support animal if the animal poses
a direct threat to the safety or health of others or poses a direct threat of physical damage to the property that
cannot be reduced or eliminated by another reasonable accommodation;
(b) if a tenant's disability-related need for an emotional support animal is not readily apparent,
request supporting information that reasonably supports the tenant's need for the particular emotional support
animal being requested. Supporting information may must include:
(i) information from a health care practitioner who has personal knowledge of the tenant's
disability and is acting within the scope of the practitioner's practice that identifies the particular assistance or
therapeutic emotional support provided by the specific animal. Information submitted under this subsection
(2)(b)(i) must include the effective date, license number, and type of professional license held by the health
care practitioner; and or
(ii) information from any other source that the landlord determines to be reliable in accordance with
the federal Fair Housing Act and Title 49, chapter 2; and
(c) require proof of compliance with state and local licensure and vaccination requirements for
each emotional support animal.
(3) If a tenant requests to keep more than one emotional support animal, information for each
emotional support animal must be provided pursuant to subsection (2).
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 149
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 149
(4) A landlord:
(a) may not request information under this section that discloses a diagnosis or severity of a
tenant's disability or any medical records relating to the disability, but a tenant may voluntarily disclose such
information or medical records to the landlord at the tenant's discretion; and
(b) shall issue a written determination after receiving supplemental information required in
subsection (2) and notice the determination pursuant to 70-33-106.
(5) An emotional support animal registration of any kind, including but not limited to an
identification card, patch, certificate, or similar registration obtained electronically or in person, is not, by itself,
sufficient information to reliably establish that a tenant has a disability-related need for an emotional support
animal.
(6) A tenant with a disability-related need for an emotional support animal is liable for any damage
done to the premises or to another person on the premises by the tenant's emotional support animal.
(7) A health care practitioner may be subject to disciplinary action from the health care
practitioner's licensing board for a violation of this section.
(8) This section does not apply to a service animal as defined in 49-4-203.
(9) Nothing in this section may be construed to restrict existing federal law and state law related to
a person's right to a reasonable accommodation and equal access to housing, including but not limited to the
federal Fair Housing Act, the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, or Title 49, chapter 2.
(10) The required submission of documentation by a renter to a landlord verifying the need for an
emotional support animal may not be construed to mandate or compel the landlord or a business to permit the
entry or presence of the emotional support animal if the landlord or business complies with applicable federal,
state, and local laws.
(10)(11)As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Emotional support animal" means an animal that a health care practitioner has determined
provides emotional, cognitive, or other similar support to an individual with a disability and does not need to be
trained or certified. The term does not include service animals as defined in 49-4-203.
(b) "Health care practitioner" means a mental health professional as defined in 53-21-102 who is
licensed to practice in this state and who:
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 149
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 149
(i) has established a client-provider relationship with a tenant at least 30 days prior to providing
supporting information requested from a landlord regarding the tenant's need for an emotional support animal;
(ii) completes a clinical evaluation of a tenant regarding the need for an emotional support animal;
and
(iii) is acting within the scope of practice of the person's license or certificate."
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 149
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 149, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 149
INTRODUCED BY D. LOGE, E. BUTTREY, K. SEEKINS-CROWE
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE DOCUMENTATION OF EMOTIONAL SUPPORT ANIMALS;
PROVIDING SUPPLEMENTAL INFORMATION REQUIREMENTS; REVISING DEFINITIONS; AND AMENDING
SECTIONS 70-24-114 AND 70-33-110, MCA.